Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 708.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 708.6 Intimidation with a dangerous weapon. 1. A person commits a class âCâ felony when the person, with the intent to injure or provoke fear or anger in another , shoots, throws, launches, or discharges a dangerous weapon at another person or at , into, or in a building, vehicle, airplane, railroad engine, railroad car, or boat, occupied by another person, or within an assembly of people, and thereby places the occupants or people in reasonable apprehension of serious injury or threatens to commit such an act under circumstances raising a reasonable expectation that the threat will be carried out. 2. A person commits a class âDâ felony when the person shoots, throws, launches, or discharges a dangerous weapon at another person or at , into, or in a building, vehicle, airplane, railroad engine, railroad car, or boat, occupied by another person, or within an assembly of people, and thereby places the occupants or people in reasonable apprehension of Senate File 2114, p. 2 serious injury or threatens to commit such an act under circumstances raising a reasonable expectation that the threat will be carried out. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2114, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor